Maryland, session 2025, SB0016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
13–1113.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0016*

SENATE BILL 16
(a) As provided in the State budget, AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, the Authority may award:
(1) Grants and loans to local jurisdictions or other appropriate entities for
planning, design, acquisition, development, preservation, restoration, interpretation,
marketing, and programming of certified heritage areas; and
(2) Grants to local jurisdictions or other appropriate entities to develop
management plans in recognized heritage areas.
(b) A grant to develop a management plan may not exceed [50%] 80% of the cost
of the management plan.
(c) An acquisition or development grant:
(1) May not be used for any purpose other than implementation of the
certified heritage area in conformity with the approved management plan; and
(2) May not exceed [50%] 80% of the total project cost for which the grant
is awarded.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Authority may make
program grants to local jurisdictions and other appropriate entities:
(i) To develop and present interpretive exhibits, materials or other
appropriate products to further the educational and recreational objectives of the certified
heritage areas program; and
(ii) To encourage revitalization of, and reinvestment in, certified
heritage area resources.
(2) A program grant made by the Authority under paragraph (1) of this
subsection [may]:
(I) MAY BE IN AN AMOUNT UP TO $300,000; AND
(II) MAY not exceed [50%] 80% of the estimated project cost.
(e) Through the resources of the members of the Authority and in cooperation
with other State agencies, the Authority shall provide technical assistance to management
entities implementing a management plan.
13–1114.
(a) There is a Maryland Heritage Areas Authority Financing Fund.

SENATE BILL 16 3
(b) (1) The Authority shall use the Fund as a continuing, nonlapsing, revolving
fund for carrying out the purposes of this subtitle.
(2) No part of the Fund may revert or be credited to the General Fund or
to any other special fund of the State.
(c) The Authority shall place all of the following receipts in the Fund:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds;
(2) Revenues that the Authority collects or receives from any source under
this subtitle; and
(3) Any additional revenue, gift, donation, or money received or paid to it
from any other source authorized by law.
(d) The Authority shall pay all expenses and make all expenditures from the
Fund.
(e) (1) The Authority may pledge and charge all or a portion of the receipts of
the Fund for the payment of:
(i) Debt service on bonds of the Authority; and
(ii) All reasonable charges and expenses related to borrowing by the
Authority and management of the obligations of the Authority.
(2) A pledge made under paragraph (1) of this subsection is effective as
provided in § 13–1119 of this subtitle and any applicable resolution of the Authority.
(f) The State Treasurer shall:
(1) Invest and reinvest the Fund in the same manner as State funds; and
(2) Transfer any investment earnings to the credit of the Fund.
(g) (1) In this subsection, “Program Open Space funds transferred to the
Authority” means the money appropriated to the Fund from Program Open Space funds
under § 5–903(a) of the Natural Resources Article.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, Program Open
Space funds transferred to the Authority may not be used to pay the operating expenses of
the Authority, debt service of bonds issued by the Authority, or administrative expenses
related to bonds issued by the Authority.
(3) (i) Up to [10%] 7% of Program Open Space funds transferred to the
Authority may be used to pay the operating expenses of the Authority.

SENATE BILL 16
(ii) Up to 50% of Program Open Space funds transferred to the
Authority may be expended for debt service on bonds issued by the Authority.
(iii) For fiscal year 2012 only, an additional $500,000 of Program
Open Space funds transferred to the Authority may be used to pay operating expenses in
the Department of Planning.
Article – Natural Resources
5–903.
(a) (1) (i) Of the funds distributed to Program Open Space under § 13–209
of the Tax – Property Article, up to [$3,000,000] $12,000,000 may be transferred by an
appropriation in the State budget, or by an amendment to the State budget under Title 7,
Subtitle 2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, to the Maryland Heritage Areas
Authority Financing Fund established under Title 13, Subtitle 11 of the Financial
Institutions Article to be used for the purposes provided in that subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.